Washington statutes.
RCW 18.235.090

Appeal.

A person who has been disciplined or has been denied a license by a disciplinary authority may appeal the decision as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 2007 c 256 s 16; 2002 c 86 s 110.]